Mississippi, session 2026, HB927.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-139-15, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-139-15.  Effective July 1, 2026, all administrative, instructional and noninstructional employees of the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science (MSMS) shall be transferred from state service and the express authority of the State Personnel Board under Section 25-9-107(c) to employment status as employees of the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science.  All administrative and instructional employees at the school shall enter into written contracts of employment to indicate and cover the period for which they are respectively employed.  All contracts for administrative and instructional employees shall be exempt from the requirements of the Public Procurement Review Board for state agency employment contracts.  The State Board of Education may set and determine qualifications necessary for such employees and may appoint a subcommittee of the board for the purpose of authorizing the execution of such employment contracts on a timely basis.  Such administrators and employees shall be offered contracts by the Executive Director of the MSMS and shall have the employment rights prescribed for administrative and certificated school district employees under Sections 37917, 37959, 379103 and 377307. The MSMS may renew employment or nonrenew employment with such administrative and instructional employees in accordance with the provisions of said sections relating to school district employment.  Noninstructional employees of the MSMS shall be full-time employees of the MSMS and shall serve at the will and pleasure of the Executive Director of the MSMS.  All salaries and contracts shall be subject to the approval of the State Board of Education, and the MSMS may continue to use the teacher salary scale for its instructional employees which is in effect on January 1, 2026.  Any unused leave accumulated at the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science shall be transferred in accordance with the provisions of Section 377307.  There shall be no interruption of service with the Public Employees' Retirement System and the State and School Employees' Health Insurance Plan for administrative, instructional and noninstructional employees due to an employee's employment status under this subsection.  The MSMS shall not be considered a local educational agency for the same purposes and to the same extent that all other school districts in the state are deemed local educational agencies under applicable federal law.  The MSMS may receive donations or grants from any public or private source, including any federal funding that may be available to the schools within the MSMS, and shall have LEA status for grants and funding opportunities that require LEA designation. SECTION 2.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-139-17, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-139-17.  (1)  The State Board of Education at the recommendation of the State Superintendent of Public Education and the Executive Director of the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science (MSMS) shall appoint an advisory council to assist the board in developing plans relating to the school.  The MSMS advisory council will serve in an advisory capacity only, with no independent policymaking authority.  The advisory council shall consist of the following eleven (11) appointed or designated members: (a)  Three (3) licensed teachers, counselors or administrators, one (1) to be appointed from each of the three (3) Mississippi Supreme Court Districts; (b)  Three (3) citizens or professionals representing the areas of science, technology, engineering, arts or mathematics, to be appointed from one (1) of the three (3) Mississippi Supreme Court Districts; (c)  Two (2) citizens knowledgeable in business, personnel management or public administration, with at least three (3) years' actual experience therein, one (1) to be appointed from the three (3) Mississippi Supreme Court Districts; (d)  One (1) parent of a MSMS junior; (e)  One (1) member shall be a representative of the Mississippi Association for Gifted Students, to be designated by the association; and (f)  One (1) member shall be a representative of the state institutions of higher learning in Mississippi which offer degrees in STEM, to be designated by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. (2)  (a)  Appointments to the advisory council shall be made within ninety (90) days of July 1, 2026. Each member shall serve a term of two (2) years.  To establish staggered expiration dates for membership after the initial year of reconstituting the council, some members may be appointed to staggered or extended terms.  Members may be reappointed for one (1) additional consecutive term. (b)  Appointments shall be made at the State Board of Education's regularly scheduled June meeting, with service to begin at the August meeting of the MSMS Advisory Council.  The advisory council shall meet twice a year in January and August. One (1) meeting shall be in person and one (1) shall be conducted virtually.  Terms will be set so that a portion of the appointments will expire each year. (3)  In the event of a vacancy in any position subject to appointment under this section, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment of the State Board of Education, based upon recommendations submitted by the State Superintendent of Public Education and the Executive Director of MSMS. (4)  The advisory council shall organize for business by selecting a chairman and a vice chairman, the latter of whom shall serve as secretary for keeping records of the council. Officer positions will be for a one (1) year term.  Six (6) members shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business. Members of the advisory council shall receive no compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses and mileage for attending meetings and necessary business of the panel, in the amount authorized for state employees under Section 25-3-41. SECTION 3.  Section 37-139-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-139-3.  (1)  There is hereby created the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science which shall be a residential school for eleventh and twelfth grade high school students, and as space allows, tenth grade high school students, located on the campus of the Mississippi University for Women. (2)  The school shall be governed by the State Board of Education. (3)  The board shall develop a plan relating to the opening, the operation and the funding of the school. Such plan shall be presented to the Legislature during the 1988 Regular Session and shall include an equitable and reasonable plan for student recruitment without regard to race, creed or color. (4)  The purpose of the school shall be to educate the gifted and talented students of the state, and its curriculum and admissions policies shall reflect such purpose. (5)  The board shall prepare the annual budget for the school. SECTION 4.  Section 37-139-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-139-5.  The board may hire a director when it so deems one necessary and when sufficient funds have been appropriated.  The director shall serve at the board's will and pleasure.  * * *He The director shall be the chief administrative officer of the school and shall administer the school in accordance with policies established by the board.  The director shall be responsible for such administrative duties and functions as the board shall so prescribe.  The board shall be authorized, in its discretion, to delegate to the director such of its powers and duties as it deems appropriate. SECTION 5.  Section 37-139-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-139-9.  The board shall be the exclusive governing body of the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science and * * *is hereby authorized and empowered to shall promulgate rules and regulations required * * *to carry out for the administration and operation of the school, consistent with the provisions of this chapter.  The emphasis of this school shall be dedicated to the academic teaching of mathematics and the sciences, but shall not preclude some emphasis being placed on the arts and humanities as deemed appropriate by the board. SECTION 6.  Section 25-9-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-9-107.  The following terms, when used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, shall have the following meanings: (a)  "Board" means the State Personnel Board created under the provisions of this chapter. (b)  "State service" means all employees of state departments, agencies and institutions as defined herein, except those officers and employees excluded by this chapter. (c)  "Nonstate service" means the following officers and employees excluded from the state service by this chapter.  The following are excluded from the state service: (i)  Members of the State Legislature, their staff and other employees of the legislative branch; (ii)  The Governor and staff members of the immediate Office of the Governor; (iii)  Justices and judges of the judicial branch or members of appeals boards on a per diem basis; (iv)  The Lieutenant Governor, staff members of the immediate Office of the Lieutenant Governor and officers and employees directly appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (v)  Officers and officials elected by popular vote and persons appointed to fill vacancies in elective offices; (vi)  Members of boards and commissioners appointed by the Governor, Lieutenant Governor or the State Legislature; (vii)  All academic officials, members of the teaching staffs and employees of the state institutions of higher learning, the Mississippi Community College Board, and community and junior colleges; (viii)  Officers and enlisted members of the National Guard of the state; (ix)  Prisoners, inmates, student or patient help working in or about institutions; (x)  Contract personnel; provided that any agency which employs state service employees may enter into contracts for personal and professional services only if such contracts are approved in compliance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the Public Procurement Review Board under Section 27-104-7.  Before paying any warrant for such contractual services in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00), the Auditor of Public Accounts, or the successor to those duties, shall determine whether the contract involved was for personal or professional services, and, if so, was approved by the Public Procurement Review Board as required by law; (xi)  Part-time employees; however, part-time employees shall only be hired into authorized employment positions classified by the board, shall meet minimum qualifications as set by the board, and shall be paid in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan as certified by the board; (xii)  Persons appointed on an emergency basis for the duration of the emergency; the effective date of the emergency appointments shall not be earlier than the date approved by the State Personnel Director, and shall be limited to thirty (30) working days.  Emergency appointments may be extended to sixty (60) working days by the State Personnel Board; (xiii)  Physicians, dentists, veterinarians, nurse practitioners and attorneys, while serving in their professional capacities in authorized employment positions who are required by statute to be licensed, registered or otherwise certified as such, provided that the State Personnel Director shall verify that the statutory qualifications are met prior to issuance of a payroll warrant by the Auditor; (xiv)  Personnel who are employed and paid from funds received from a federal grant program which has been approved by the Legislature or the Department of Finance and Administration whose length of employment has been determined to be time-limited in nature.  This subparagraph shall apply to personnel employed under the provisions of the Comprehensive Employment and Training Act of 1973, as amended, and other special federal grant programs which are not a part of regular federally funded programs wherein appropriations and employment positions are appropriated by the Legislature.  Such employees shall be paid in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan and shall meet all qualifications required by federal statutes or by the Mississippi Classification Plan; (xv)  The administrative head who is in charge of any state department, agency, institution, board or commission, wherein the statute specifically authorizes the Governor, board, commission or other authority to appoint said administrative head; however, the salary of such administrative head shall be determined by the State Personnel Board in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan unless otherwise fixed by statute; (xvi)  The State Personnel Board shall exclude top-level positions if the incumbents determine and publicly advocate substantive program policy and report directly to the agency head, or the incumbents are required to maintain a direct confidential working relationship with a key excluded official.  Further, a written job classification shall be approved by the board for each such position, and positions so excluded shall be paid in conformity with the Variable Compensation Plan; (xvii)  Employees whose employment is solely in connection with an agency's contract to produce, store or transport goods, and whose compensation is derived therefrom; (xviii)  Repealed; (xix)  The associate director, deputy directors and bureau directors within the Department of Agriculture and Commerce; (xx)  Personnel employed by the Mississippi Industries for the Blind; provided that any agency may enter into contracts for the personal services of MIB employees without the prior approval of the State Personnel Board or the State Personal Service Contract Review Board; however, any agency contracting for the personal services of an MIB employee shall provide the MIB employee with not less than the entry-level compensation and benefits that the agency would provide to a full-time employee of the agency who performs the same services; (xxi)  Personnel employed by the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks and the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources as law enforcement trainees (cadets); such personnel shall be paid in accordance with the Colonel Guy Groff State Variable Compensation Plan; (xxii) Administrators and instructional employees under contract or employed by the Mississippi School of the Arts (MSA) established in Section 37-140-1 et seq.; (xxiii)  The President of the Mississippi Lottery Corporation and personnel employed by the Mississippi Lottery Corporation; (xxiv)  Employees, excluding administrative employees, of the State Veterans Affairs Board who are employed at a veterans home established by the State Veterans Affairs Board under Section 35-1-19; (xxv)  Personnel employed by the Mississippi Department of Health whose employment is solely in connection with the department's responsibilities in implementing, administering and enforcing provisions of the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act.  This subparagraph shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026;  * * *and (xxvi)  Personnel employed by the Mississippi Department of Revenue whose employment is solely in connection with the department's responsibilities in implementing, administering and enforcing provisions of the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act.  This subparagraph shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026 * * *.; and (xxvii) Administrators and instructional employees under contract or employed by the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science established in Section 37-139-1 et seq. (d)  "Agency" means any state board, commission, committee, council, department or unit thereof created by the Constitution or statutes if such board, commission, committee, council, department, unit or the head thereof, is authorized to appoint subordinate staff by the Constitution or statute, except a legislative or judicial board, commission, committee, council, department or unit thereof. SECTION 7.  Section 31-7-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 31-7-1.  The following terms are defined for the purposes of this chapter to have the following meanings: (a)  "Agency" means any state board, commission, committee, council, university, department or unit thereof created by the Constitution or statutes if such board, commission, committee, council, university, department, unit or the head thereof is authorized to appoint subordinate staff by the Constitution or statute, except a legislative or judicial board, commission, committee, council, department or unit thereof; except a charter school authorized by the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board;  * * *and except the Mississippi State Port Authority; except the Mississippi School of the Arts (MSA) established in Section 37-140-1 et seq., for the sole purpose of the application of the term "agency" as it pertains to the Public Procurement Review Board's powers and responsibilities as defined in Section 27-104-7(2)(a), but without application to the use of the term within this chapter, effective July 1, 2020; * * *and except the Mississippi School for the Blind and the Mississippi School for the Deaf (MSBD) for the sole purpose of the application of the term "agency" as it pertains to the Public Procurement Review Board's powers and responsibilities as defined in Section 27-104-7(2)(a), but without application to the use of the term within this chapter, effective July 1, 2021; and except the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science established in Section 37-139-1 et seq., for the sole purpose of the application of the term "agency" as it pertains to the Public Procurement Review Board's powers and responsibilities as defined in Section 27-104-7(2)(a), but without application to the use of the term within this chapter, effective July 1, 2026. An academic medical center or health sciences school as defined in Section 37-115-50 is not an "agency" for those purchases of commodities as defined in this section that are used for clinical purposes and (i) intended for use in the diagnosis of disease or other conditions or in the cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease, and (ii) medical devices, biological, drugs and radiation emitting devices as defined by the United States Food and Drug Administration. (b)  "Governing authority" means boards of supervisors, governing boards of all school districts, all boards of directors of public water supply districts, boards of directors of master public water supply districts, municipal public utility commissions, governing authorities of all municipalities, port authorities, Mississippi State Port Authority, commissioners and boards of trustees of any public hospitals, boards of trustees of public library systems, district attorneys, school attendance officers and any political subdivision of the state supported wholly or in part by public funds of the state or political subdivisions thereof, including commissions, boards and agencies created or operated under the authority of any county or municipality of this state.  The term "governing authority" shall not include economic development authorities supported in part by private funds, or commissions appointed to hold title to and oversee the development and management of lands and buildings which are donated by private individuals to the public for the use and benefit of the community and which are supported in part by private funds.  The term "governing authority" also shall not include the governing board of a charter school.  The term "governing authority" also shall not include the Mississippi School of the Arts established in Section 37-140-1 et seq., for the sole purpose of the application of the term "agency" as it pertains to the Public Procurement Review Board's powers and responsibilities as defined in Section 27-104-7(2)(a), but without application to the use of the term within this chapter, effective July 1, 2020.  The term "governing authority" also shall not include the Mississippi School for the Blind and the Mississippi School for the Deaf (MSBD) for the sole purpose of the application of the term "governing authority" as it pertains to the Public Procurement Review Board's powers and responsibilities as defined in Section 27-104-7(2)(a), but without application to the use of the term within this chapter, effective July 1, 2021.  The term "governing authority" also shall not include the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science established in Section 37-139-1 et seq., for the sole purpose of the application of the term "governing authority" as it pertains to the Public Procurement Review Board's powers and responsibilities as defined in Section 27-104-7(2)(a), but without application to the use of the term within this chapter, effective July 1, 2026. (c)  "Purchasing agent" means any administrator, superintendent, purchase clerk or other chief officer so designated having general or special authority to negotiate for and make private contract for or purchase for any governing authority or agency, including issue purchase orders, invitations for bid, requests for proposals, and receive and accept bids. (d)  "Public funds" means and includes any appropriated funds, special funds, fees or any other emoluments received by an agency or governing authority. (e) "Commodities" means and includes the various commodities, goods, merchandise, furniture, equipment, automotive equipment of every kind, and other personal property purchased by the agencies of the state and governing authorities, but not commodities purchased for resale or raw materials converted into products for resale. (i) "Equipment" shall be construed to include: automobiles, trucks, tractors, office appliances and all other equipment of every kind and description. (ii) "Furniture" shall be construed to include:  desks, chairs, tables, seats, filing cabinets, bookcases and all other items of a similar nature as well as dormitory furniture, appliances, carpets and all other items of personal property generally referred to as home, office or school furniture. (f) "Emergency" means any circumstances caused by fire, flood, explosion, storm, earthquake, epidemic, riot, insurrection or caused by any inherent defect due to defective construction, or when the immediate preservation of order or of public health is necessary by reason of unforeseen emergency, or when the immediate restoration of a condition of usefulness of any public building, equipment, road or bridge appears advisable, or in the case of a public utility when there is a failure of any machine or other thing used and useful in the generation, production or distribution of electricity, water or natural gas, or in the transportation or treatment of sewage; or when the delay incident to obtaining competitive bids could cause adverse impact upon the governing authorities or agency, its employees or its citizens; or in the case of a public airport, when the delay incident to publishing an advertisement for competitive bids would endanger public safety in a specific (not general) manner, result in or perpetuate a specific breach of airport security, or prevent the airport from providing specific air transportation services. (g) "Construction" means the process of building, altering, improving, renovating or demolishing a public structure, public building, or other public real property.  It does not include routine operation, routine repair or regularly scheduled maintenance of existing public structures, public buildings or other public real property. (h) "Purchase" means buying, renting, leasing or otherwise acquiring. (i)  "Certified purchasing office" means any purchasing office in which fifty percent (50%) or more of the purchasing agents hold a certification from the Universal Public Purchasing Certification Council or other nationally recognized purchasing certification, and in which, in the case of a state agency purchasing office, in addition to the national certification, one hundred percent (100%) of the purchasing officials hold a certification from the State of Mississippi's Basic or Advanced Purchasing Certification Program. (j)  "Certified Mississippi Purchasing Agent" means a state agency purchasing official who holds a certification from the Mississippi Basic Purchasing Certification Program as established by the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management. (k)  "Certified Mississippi Procurement Manager" means a state agency purchasing official who holds a certification from the Mississippi Advanced Purchasing Certification Program as established by the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management. SECTION 8.  Section 37-7-307, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-7-307.  (1)  For purposes of this section, the term "licensed employee" means any employee of a public school district required to hold a valid license by the Commission on Teacher and Administrator Education, Certification and Licensure and Development. (2)  The school board of a school district shall establish by rules and regulations a policy of sick leave with pay for licensed employees and teacher assistants employed in the school district, and such policy shall include the following minimum provisions for sick and emergency leave with pay: (a)  Each licensed employee and teacher assistant, at the beginning of each school year, shall be credited with a minimum sick leave allowance, with pay, of seven (7) days for absences caused by illness or physical disability of the employee during that school year. (b)  Any unused portion of the total sick leave allowance shall be carried over to the next school year and credited to such licensed employee and teacher assistant if the licensed employee or teacher assistant remains employed in the same school district.  In the event any public school licensed employee or teacher assistant transfers from one public school district in Mississippi to another, any unused portion of the total sick leave allowance credited to such licensed employee or teacher assistant shall be credited to such licensed employee or teacher assistant in the computation of unused leave for retirement purposes under Section 25-11-109. Accumulation of sick leave allowed under this section shall be unlimited. (c)  No deduction from the pay of such licensed employee or teacher assistant may be made because of absence of such licensed employee or teacher assistant caused by illness or physical disability of the licensed employee or teacher assistant until after all sick leave allowance credited to such licensed employee or teacher assistant has been used. (d)  For the first ten (10) days of absence of a licensed employee because of illness or physical disability, in any school year, in excess of the sick leave allowance credited to such licensed employee, there shall be deducted from the pay of such licensed employee the established substitute amount of licensed employee compensation paid in that local school district, necessitated because of the absence of the licensed employee as a result of illness or physical disability.  In lieu of deducting the established substitute amount from the pay of such licensed employee, the policy may allow the licensed employee to receive full pay for the first ten (10) days of absence because of illness or physical disability, in any school year, in excess of the sick leave allowance credited to such licensed employee.  Thereafter, the regular pay of such absent licensed employee shall be suspended and withheld in its entirety for any period of absence because of illness or physical disability during that school year. (3)  (a)  Beginning with the school year 1983-1984, each licensed employee at the beginning of each school year shall be credited with a minimum personal leave allowance, with pay, of two (2) days for absences caused by personal reasons during that school year. Effective for the 2010-2011 and 2011-2012 school years, licensed employees shall be credited with an additional one-half (1/2) day of personal leave for every day the licensed employee is furloughed without pay as provided in Section 37-7-308.  Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, such personal leave shall not be taken on the first day of the school term, the last day of the school term, on a day previous to a holiday or a day after a holiday.  Personal leave may be used for professional purposes, including absences caused by attendance of such licensed employee at a seminar, class, training program, professional association or other functions designed for educators.  No deduction from the pay of such licensed employee may be made because of absence of such licensed employee caused by personal reasons until after all personal leave allowance credited to such licensed employee has been used.  However, the superintendent of a school district, in his discretion, may allow a licensed employee personal leave in addition to any minimum personal leave allowance, under the condition that there shall be deducted from the salary of such licensed employee the actual amount of any compensation paid to any person as a substitute, necessitated because of the absence of the licensed employee. Any unused portion of the total personal leave allowance up to five (5) days shall be carried over to the next school year and credited to such licensed employee if the licensed employee remains employed in the same school district.  Any personal leave allowed for a furlough day shall not be carried over to the next school year. (b)  Notwithstanding the restrictions on the use of personal leave prescribed under paragraph (a) of this subsection, a licensed employee may use personal leave as follows: (i)  Personal leave may be taken on the first day of the school term, the last day of the school term, on a day previous to a holiday or a day after a holiday if, on the applicable day, an immediate family member of the employee is being deployed for military service. (ii)  Personal leave may be taken on a day previous to a holiday or a day after a holiday if an employee of a school district has either a minimum of ten (10) years' experience as an employee of that school district or a minimum of thirty (30) days of unused accumulated leave that has been earned while employed in that school district. (iii)  Personal leave may be taken on the first day of the school term, the last day of the school term, on a day previous to a holiday or a day after a holiday if, on the applicable day, the employee has been summoned to appear for jury duty or as a witness in court. (iv)  Personal leave may be taken on the first day of the school term, the last day of the school term, on a day previous to a holiday or a day after a holiday if, on the applicable day, an immediate family member of the employee dies or funeral services are held.  Any day of the three (3) bereavement days may be used at the discretion of the teacher, and are not required to be taken in consecutive succession. For the purpose of this subsection (3), the term "immediate family member" means spouse, parent, stepparent, child or stepchild, grandparent or sibling, including a stepbrother or stepsister. (4)  Beginning with the school year 1992-1993, each licensed employee shall be credited with a professional leave allowance, with pay, for each day of absence caused by reason of such employee's statutorily required membership and attendance at a regular or special meeting held within the State of Mississippi of the State Board of Education, the Commission on Teacher and Administrator Education, Certification and Licensure and Development, the Commission on School Accreditation, the Mississippi Authority for Educational Television, the meetings of the state textbook rating committees or other meetings authorized by local school board policy. (5)  Upon retirement from employment, each licensed and nonlicensed employee shall be paid for not more than thirty (30) days of unused accumulated leave earned while employed by the school district in which the employee is last employed.  Such payment for licensed employees shall be made by the school district at a rate equal to the amount paid to substitute teachers and for nonlicensed employees, the payment shall be made by the school district at a rate equal to the federal minimum wage.  The payment shall be treated in the same manner for retirement purposes as a lump-sum payment for personal leave as provided in Section 25-11-103(f). Any remaining lawfully credited unused leave, for which payment has not been made, shall be certified to the Public Employees' Retirement System in the same manner and subject to the same limitations as otherwise provided by law for unused leave.  No payment for unused accumulated leave may be made to either a licensed or nonlicensed employee at termination or separation from service for any purpose other than for the purpose of retirement. (6)  The school board may adopt rules and regulations which will reasonably aid to implement the policy of sick and personal leave, including, but not limited to, rules and regulations having the following general effect: (a)  Requiring the absent employee to furnish the certificate of a physician or dentist or other medical practitioner as to the illness of the absent licensed employee, where the absence is for four (4) or more consecutive school days, or for two (2) consecutive school days immediately preceding or following a nonschool day; (b)  Providing penalties, by way of full deduction from salary, or entry on the work record of the employee, or other appropriate penalties, for any materially false statement by the employee as to the cause of absence; (c)  Forfeiture of accumulated or future sick leave, if the absence of the employee is caused by optional dental or medical treatment or surgery which could, without medical risk, have been provided, furnished or performed at a time when school was not in session; (d)  Enlarging, increasing or providing greater sick or personal leave allowances than the minimum standards established by this section in the discretion of the school board of each school district. (7)  School boards may include in their budgets provisions for the payment of substitute employees, necessitated because of the absence of regular licensed employees.  All such substitute employees shall be paid wholly from district funds.  Such school boards, in their discretion, also may pay, from district funds other than the total funding formula funds provided for in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215, the whole or any part of the salaries of all employees granted leaves for the purpose of special studies or training. (8)  The school board may further adopt rules and regulations which will reasonably implement such leave policies for all other nonlicensed and hourly paid school employees as the board deems appropriate.  Effective for the 2010-2011 and 2011-2012 school years, nonlicensed employees shall be credited with an additional one-half (1/2) day of personal leave for every day the nonlicensed employee is furloughed without pay as provided in Section 37-7-308. (9)  Vacation leave granted to either licensed or nonlicensed employees shall be synonymous with personal leave.  Unused vacation or personal leave accumulated by licensed employees in excess of the maximum five (5) days which may be carried over from one year to the next may be converted to sick leave.  The annual conversion of unused vacation or personal leave to sick days for licensed or unlicensed employees shall not exceed the allowable number of personal leave days as provided in Section 25-3-93. The annual total number of converted unused vacation and/or personal days added to the annual unused sick days for any employee shall not exceed the combined allowable number of days per year provided in Sections 25-3-93 and 25-3-95. Local school board policies that provide for vacation, personal and sick leave for employees shall not exceed the provisions for leave as provided in Sections 25-3-93 and 25-3-95.  Any personal or vacation leave previously converted to sick leave under a lawfully adopted policy before May 1, 2004, or such personal or vacation leave accumulated and available for use prior to May 1, 2004, under a lawfully adopted policy but converted to sick leave after May 1, 2004, shall be recognized as accrued leave by the local school district and available for use by the employee.  The leave converted under a lawfully adopted policy prior to May 1, 2004, or such personal and vacation leave accumulated and available for use as of May 1, 2004, which was subsequently converted to sick leave may be certified to the Public Employees' Retirement System upon termination of employment and any such leave previously converted and certified to the Public Employees' Retirement System shall be recognized. (10)  (a)  For the purposes of this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meaning ascribed in this paragraph unless the context requires otherwise: (i) "Catastrophic injury or illness" means a life-threatening injury or illness of an employee or a member of an employee's immediate family that totally incapacitates the employee from work, as verified by a licensed physician, and forces the employee to exhaust all leave time earned by that employee, resulting in the loss of compensation from the local school district for the employee.  Conditions that are short-term in nature, including, but not limited to, common illnesses such as influenza and the measles, and common injuries, are not catastrophic.  Chronic illnesses or injuries, such as cancer or major surgery, that result in intermittent absences from work and that are long-term in nature and require long recuperation periods may be considered catastrophic. (ii) "Immediate family" means spouse, parent, stepparent, sibling, child or stepchild, grandparent, stepbrother or stepsister. (b)  Any school district employee may donate a portion of his or her unused accumulated personal leave or sick leave to another employee of the same school district who is suffering from a catastrophic injury or illness or who has a member of his or her immediate family suffering from a catastrophic injury or illness, in accordance with the following: (i)  The employee donating the leave (the "donor employee") shall designate the employee who is to receive the leave (the "recipient employee") and the amount of unused accumulated personal leave and sick leave that is to be donated, and shall notify the school district superintendent or his designee of his or her designation. (ii)  The maximum amount of unused accumulated personal leave that an employee may donate to any other employee may not exceed a number of days that would leave the donor employee with fewer than seven (7) days of personal leave remaining, and the maximum amount of unused accumulated sick leave that an employee may donate to any other employee may not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the unused accumulated sick leave of the donor employee. (iii)  An employee must have exhausted all of his or her available leave before he or she will be eligible to receive any leave donated by another employee.  Eligibility for donated leave shall be based upon review and approval by the donor employee's supervisor. (iv)  Before an employee may receive donated leave, he or she must provide the school district superintendent or his designee with a physician's statement that states that the illness meets the catastrophic criteria established under this section, the beginning date of the catastrophic injury or illness, a description of the injury or illness, and a prognosis for recovery and the anticipated date that the recipient employee will be able to return to work. (v)  Before an employee may receive donated leave, the superintendent of education of the school district shall appoint a review committee to approve or disapprove the said donations of leave, including the determination that the illness is catastrophic within the meaning of this section. (vi)  If the total amount of leave that is donated to any employee is not used by the recipient employee, the whole days of donated leave shall be returned to the donor employees on a pro rata basis, based on the ratio of the number of days of leave donated by each donor employee to the total number of days of leave donated by all donor employees. (vii)  Donated leave shall not be used in lieu of disability retirement. (11)  Effective January 1, 2020, the provisions of this section shall be fully applicable to any licensed employee of the Mississippi School of the Arts (MSA). (12)  Effective July 1, 2026, the provisions of this section shall be fully applicable to any licensed employee of the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science(MSMS). SECTION 9.  Section 37-9-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-9-17.  (1)  On or before April 1 of each year, the principal of each school shall recommend to the superintendent of the local school district the licensed employees or noninstructional employees to be employed for the school involved except those licensed employees or noninstructional employees who have been previously employed and who have a contract valid for the ensuing scholastic year.  If such recommendations meet with the approval of the superintendent, the superintendent shall recommend the employment of such licensed employees or noninstructional employees to the local school board, and, unless good reason to the contrary exists, the board shall elect the employees so recommended. If, for any reason, the local school board shall decline to elect any employee so recommended, additional recommendations for the places to be filled shall be made by the principal to the superintendent and then by the superintendent to the local school board as provided above.  The school board of any local school district shall be authorized to designate a personnel supervisor or another principal employed by the school district to recommend to the superintendent licensed employees or noninstructional employees; however, this authorization shall be restricted to no more than two (2) positions for each employment period for each school in the local school district.  Any noninstructional employee employed upon the recommendation of a personnel supervisor or another principal employed by the local school district must have been employed by the local school district at the time the superintendent was elected or appointed to office; a noninstructional employee employed under this authorization may not be paid compensation in excess of the statewide average compensation for such noninstructional position with comparable experience, as established by the State Department of Education.  The school board of any local school district shall be authorized to designate a personnel supervisor or another principal employed by the school district to accept the recommendations of principals or their designees for licensed employees or noninstructional employees and to transmit approved recommendations to the local school board; however, this authorization shall be restricted to no more than two (2) positions for each employment period for each school in the local school district. When the licensed employees have been elected as provided in the preceding paragraph, the superintendent of the district shall enter into a contract with such persons in the manner provided in this chapter. If, at the commencement of the scholastic year, any licensed employee shall present to the superintendent a license of a higher grade than that specified in such individual's contract, such individual may, if funds are available from the total funding formula funds of the district as provided for in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215, or from district funds, be paid from such funds the amount to which such higher grade license would have entitled the individual, had the license been held at the time the contract was executed. (2) Superintendents/directors of schools under the purview of the State Board of Education, the superintendent of the local school district and any private firm under contract with the local public school district to provide substitute teachers to teach during the absence of a regularly employed schoolteacher shall require, through the appropriate governmental authority, that current criminal records background checks and current child abuse registry checks are obtained, and that such criminal record information and registry checks are on file for any new hires applying for employment as a licensed or nonlicensed employee at a school and not previously employed in such school under the purview of the State Board of Education or at such local school district prior to July 1, 2000.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for employment, the applicant shall be fingerprinted.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.  The fee for such fingerprinting and criminal history record check shall be paid by the applicant, not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00); however, the State Board of Education, the school board of the local school district or a private firm under contract with a local school district to provide substitute teachers to teach during the temporary absence of the regularly employed schoolteacher, in its discretion, may elect to pay the fee for the fingerprinting and criminal history record check on behalf of any applicant.  Under no circumstances shall a member of the State Board of Education, superintendent/director of schools under the purview of the State Board of Education, local school district superintendent, local school board member or any individual other than the subject of the criminal history record checks disseminate information received through any such checks except insofar as required to fulfill the purposes of this section.  Any nonpublic school which is accredited or approved by the State Board of Education may avail itself of the procedures provided for herein and shall be responsible for the same fee charged in the case of local public schools of this state.  The determination whether the applicant has a disqualifying crime, as set forth in subsection (3) of this section, shall be made by the appropriate governmental authority, and the appropriate governmental authority shall notify the private firm whether a disqualifying crime exists. (3)  If such fingerprinting or criminal record checks disclose a felony conviction, guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere to a felony of possession or sale of drugs, murder, manslaughter, armed robbery, rape, sexual battery, sex offense listed in Section 45-33-23(h), child abuse, arson, grand larceny, burglary, gratification of lust or aggravated assault which has not been reversed on appeal or for which a pardon has not been granted, the new hire shall not be eligible to be employed at such school.  Any employment contract for a new hire executed by the superintendent of the local school district or any employment of a new hire by a superintendent/director of a new school under the purview of the State Board of Education or by a private firm shall be voidable if the new hire receives a disqualifying criminal record check.  However, the State Board of Education or the school board may, in its discretion, allow any applicant aggrieved by the employment decision under this section to appear before the respective board, or before a hearing officer designated for such purpose, to show mitigating circumstances which may exist and allow the new hire to be employed at the school.  The State Board of Education or local school board may grant waivers for such mitigating circumstances, which shall include, but not be limited to:  (a) age at which the crime was committed; (b) circumstances surrounding the crime; (c) length of time since the conviction and criminal history since the conviction; (d) work history; (e) current employment and character references; (f) other evidence demonstrating the ability of the person to perform the employment responsibilities competently and that the person does not pose a threat to the health or safety of the children at the school. (4)  No local school district, local school district employee, member of the State Board of Education or employee of a school under the purview of the State Board of Education shall be held liable in any employment discrimination suit in which an allegation of discrimination is made regarding an employment decision authorized under this Section 37-9-17. (5)  The provisions of this section shall be fully applicable to licensed employees of the Mississippi School of the Arts (MSA), established in Section 37-140-3. (6)  The provisions of this section shall be fully applicable to licensed employees of the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science (MSMS), established in Section 371393. SECTION 10.  Section 37-9-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-9-59.  (1)  For incompetence, neglect of duty, immoral conduct, intemperance, brutal treatment of a pupil or other good cause the superintendent of schools may dismiss or suspend any licensed employee in any school district.  Before being so dismissed or suspended any licensed employee shall be notified of the charges against him and he shall be advised that he is entitled to a public hearing upon said charges.  Provided, however, that a school superintendent whose employment has been terminated under this section shall not have the right to request a hearing before the school board or a hearing officer.  Provided, however, that a licensed employee in a conservator school district whose employment has been terminated under this section for good cause as determined by a conservator appointed by the State Board of Education shall not have a right to request a hearing before the school board, a hearing officer or the State Board of Education.  The conservator has the right to immediately terminate a licensed employee under this section.  In the event the continued presence of said employee on school premises poses a potential threat or danger to the health, safety or general welfare of the students, or, in the discretion of the superintendent, may interfere with or cause a disruption of normal school operations, the superintendent may immediately release said employee of all duties pending a hearing if one is requested by the employee.  In the event a licensed employee is arrested, indicted or otherwise charged with a felony by a recognized law enforcement official, the continued presence of the licensed employee on school premises shall be deemed to constitute a disruption of normal school operations.  The school board, upon a request for a hearing by the person so suspended or removed shall set a date, time and place for such hearing which shall be not sooner than five (5) days nor later than thirty (30) days from the date of the request.  The procedure for such hearing shall be as prescribed for hearings before the board or hearing officer in Section 37-9-111. From the decision made at said hearing, any licensed employee shall be allowed an appeal to the chancery court in the same manner as appeals are authorized in Section 37-9-113.  Any party aggrieved by action of the chancery court may appeal to the Mississippi Supreme Court as provided by law.  In the event that a licensed employee is immediately relieved of duties pending a hearing, as provided in this section, said employee shall be entitled to compensation for a period up to and including the date that the initial hearing is set by the school board, in the event that there is a request for such a hearing by the employee.  In the event that an employee does not request a hearing within five (5) calendar days of the date of the notice of discharge or suspension, it shall constitute a waiver of all rights by said employee and such discharge or suspension shall be effective on the date set out in the notice to the employee. (2)  The school board of every school district in this state is hereby prohibited from denying employment or reemployment to any person as a superintendent, principal or licensed employee, as defined in Section 37-19-1, or as a noninstructional personnel, as defined in Section 37-9-1, for the single reason that any eligible child of such person does not attend the school system in which such superintendent, principal, licensed employee or noninstructional personnel is employed. (3)  The provisions of this section shall be fully applicable to any administrator or employee of the Mississippi School of the Arts (MSA). (4) The provisions of this section shall be fully applicable to any administrator or employee of the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science (MSMS). SECTION 11.  Section 37-9-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-9-103.  (1)  As used in Sections 37-9-101 through 37-9-113, the word "employee" shall include: (a)  Any teacher, principal, superintendent or other professional personnel employed by the local school district * * *or, the Mississippi School of the Arts (MSA) or the Mississippi School for Mathematics and Science (MSMS) for a continuous period of two (2) years with that district and required to have a valid license issued by the State Department of Education as a prerequisite of employment; or (b)  Any teacher, principal, superintendent or other professional personnel who has completed a continuous period of two (2) years of employment in a Mississippi public school district and one (1) full year of employment with the school district of current employment * * *or, the MSA or MSMS, and who is required to have a valid license issued by the State Department of Education as a prerequisite of employment. (2)  (a)  The Education Employment Procedures Law shall not apply to any category of employee as defined in this section employed in any school district after the Governor declares a state of emergency under the provisions of Section 37-17-6(12).  The Education Employment Procedures Law shall not be applicable in any school district for the full period of time that those conditions, as defined in Section 37-17-6(12), exist. (b)  The Education Employment Procedures Law shall not apply to any category of teacher, administrator or other employee employed to work in any charter school. (3)  For purposes of Sections 37-9-101 through 37-9-113, the term "days" means calendar days. SECTION 12.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.